apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
    <pardef n="gaskaj/t__Pron_Recipr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dimme</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dimmega</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu1"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dimmege</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu1"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dimmek</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu1"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dimmegen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu1"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dihtte</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dihttega</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu2"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dihttege</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu2"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dihttek</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu2"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dihttegen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu2"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diska</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diskaga</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu3"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diskage</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu3"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diskak</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu3"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diskagen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxDu3"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dimme</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dimmega</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl1"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dimmege</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl1"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dimmek</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl1"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dimmegen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl1"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dihtte</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dihttega</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl2"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dihttege</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl2"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dihttek</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl2"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dihttegen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl2"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>disá</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>disága</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl3"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diságe</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl3"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>disák</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl3"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diságen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Recipr"/><s n="PxPl3"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gaskajt"><i>gaskaj</i><par n="gaskaj/t__Pron_Recipr"/></e>
